North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 5. Miscellaneous.

§ 55-1-50.
Electronic transactions.

For purposes of applying Article 40 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes to transactions under this Chapter, a corporation may agree to conduct a transaction by electronic means through provision in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or by action of its board of directors.

History.

2001-387, s. 7.

§§ 55-1-51 through 55-1-59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.